West Virginia, session 2026, HB4534.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16.  West virginia title protection act. §37-16-1. Findings. (a) The primary purpose of this article is to ensure that rightful property owners are entitled to retain the right to their property when someone lodges a fraudulent claim against that rightful owner’s land.(b) Until this point, there has been little to no protection for the rightful owners of property whenever someone makes a fraudulent attempt to create a claim on an individual’s property. Recently, private companies have been filling the void with paid subscriptions or one-time payments to ensure that fraudulent claims are not the fault of the rightful property owner; however, the West Virginia Legislature finds that these protections should be in our code.(c) The West Virginia Legislature finds that the threat of a fraudulent claim against an innocent or unaware rightful property owner presents a legitimate threat to the financial well-being of such rightful owners.(d) In fact, according to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, title and mortgage fraud are among the fastest growing white-collar crimes in America.(e) With the advent of technology, almost everything is stored online, including an individual’s title to their home and property. This presents a new threat of domestic and international cyber-thieves targeting U.S. homeowner’s equity in their homes, and in fact, removing an individual from his or her home’s title can take only minutes. These thieves can forge their name on the title document and refile it with a county clerk to make it appear as if they own the property. Afterwards, these thieves can take out loans using an individual’s home’s equity and stick that individual with the payments. Then, he or she likely will not know until they get a late payment or foreclosure notice from several banks.(f) Further, the West Virginia Legislature finds that the rightful owner of property should not be subjected to punishment or unnecessary legal action when they are a victim of this type of activity. §37-16-2. Protection of property owners from fraudulent claims. (a) Whenever an individual presents a fraudulent deed to the county clerk against a rightful owner of property or is subsequently able to get a loan using that property, the rightful property owner shall retain title to their property, free of all encumbrances, regardless of the action of the fraudulent filer. (b) The rightful property owner, regardless of the outcome of any subsequent criminal action, civil action, or otherwise, is considered the actual owner of property throughout.(c) Pursuant to the language of §37-16-3 of this code, the rightful owner of property shall receive notice anytime there is a transfer of their property, or whenever there is any document filed with the county clerk that affects their land. §37-16-3. Notice when property is transferred. (a) When an owner of land transfers their property to another, the county clerk where the land is located shall send a notice, by regular mail, that the property is being transferred. This serves as a safeguard in case the owner of the property did not initiate the land transfer.(b) When an individual files or modifies a quitclaim deed, a general warranty deed, or special warranty deed against property, the county clerk in that county shall send a notice, by regular mail, that a deed has been filed or modified, in order to provide notice to the landowner in the event that this action was done by means of fraud.